Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.035

Commemorative works account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

(1) The commemorative works account is created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be used by the department of enterprise services for the ongoing care, maintenance, and repair of commemorative works on the state capitol grounds. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not necessary for expenditures.

(2) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and Capitol Lake.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 203; 2005 c 16 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.